Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 13. Drunken Driving

§§ 1181,
1182.
Repealed. 1971, No. 258 (Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. March 1, 1973.

§§ 1183-1195.
Repealed.
1969, No. 267 (Adj. Sess.), § 11.

§ 1200.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Alcohol concentration” means

the number of grams of alcohol per 100 milliliters of blood; or

the number of grams of alcohol per 210 liters of breath.

“Drug” means:

a regulated drug as defined in

18 V.S.A. § 4201

; or

any substance or combination of substances, other than alcohol, that affects the nervous system, brain, or muscles of a person so as to impair, noticeably and appreciably, a person’s ability to drive a vehicle safely.

Subdivision (3) effective until January 1, 2022; see also subdivision (3) effective January 1, 2022 set out below.

“Evidentiary test” means a breath or blood test that indicates the person’s alcohol concentration or the presence of other drug and that is intended to be introduced as evidence.

(3)

Subdivision (3) effective January 1, 2022; see also subdivision (3) effective until January 1, 2022 set out above.

“Evidentiary test” means a breath, saliva, or blood test that indicates the person’s alcohol concentration or the presence of other drug and that is intended to be introduced as evidence.

“Alcohol” includes alcohol, malt beverages, spirits, fortified wines, and vinous beverages, as defined in

7 V.S.A. § 2

, and any beverage or liquid containing any of them.

“Law enforcement officer” means a law enforcement officer who has been certified by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council pursuant to

20 V.S.A. § 2358

.

“Vehicle” means a motor vehicle as defined in section 4 of this title and, when on a public highway:

a snowmobile as defined in section 3201 of this title; and

an all-terrain vehicle as defined in section 3501 of this title.

“Highway” has the same meaning as in subdivision 4(13) of this title, except that for purposes of this subchapter, “highway” does not include the driveway that serves only a single-family or two-family residence of the operator. This exception shall not apply if a person causes the death of a person, causes bodily injury to a person, or causes damage to the personal property of another person, while operating a motor vehicle on a driveway in violation of section 1201 of this subchapter.

“Ignition interlock device” means a device that is capable of measuring a person’s alcohol concentration and that prevents a motor vehicle from being started by a person whose alcohol concentration is 0.02 or greater.

“Ignition interlock restricted driver’s license” or “ignition interlock RDL” or “RDL” means a restricted license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle issued by the Commissioner allowing a resident whose license or privilege to operate has been suspended or revoked for operating under the influence of alcohol or in excess of legal limits of alcohol concentration, or for refusing an enforcement officer’s reasonable request for an evidentiary test, to operate a motor vehicle, other than a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 4103 of this title, installed with an approved ignition interlock device.
(9) (A) “Ignition interlock restricted driver’s license” or “ignition interlock RDL” or “RDL” means a restricted license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle issued by the Commissioner allowing a resident whose license or privilege to operate has been suspended or revoked for operating under the influence of alcohol or in excess of legal limits of alcohol concentration, or for refusing an enforcement officer’s reasonable request for an evidentiary test, to operate a motor vehicle, other than a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 4103 of this title, installed with an approved ignition interlock device.

“Ignition interlock certificate” means a restricted privilege to operate a motor vehicle issued by the Commissioner allowing a nonresident whose privilege to operate a motor vehicle in Vermont has been suspended or revoked for operating under the influence of alcohol or in excess of legal limits of alcohol concentration, or for refusing an enforcement officer’s reasonable request for an evidentiary test, to operate a motor vehicle, other than a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 4103 of this title, installed with an approved ignition interlock device.

“Random retest” means a test of a vehicle operator’s blood alcohol concentration, other than a test required to start the vehicle, that is required at random intervals during operation of a vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 68

, § 1, eff. Dec. 1, 1989; amended,

1991, No. 55

, § 1;

1997, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 10, 11;

1997, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. April 29, 1998;

1999, No. 20

, § 1;

2007, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 2011;

2011, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 45;

2017, No. 83

, § 153;

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. Jan. 1, 2022.

§ 1201. Section 1201 effective until January 1, 2022; see also section 1201 effective January 1, 2022 set out below. Operating vehicle under the influence of alcohol or other substance; criminal refusal; enhanced penalty for BAC of 0.16 or more.

A person shall not operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical control of any vehicle on a highway:

when the person’s alcohol concentration is 0.08 or more, or 0.02 or more if the person is operating a vehicle when the operation requires an operator’s license with a school bus endorsement; or

when the person is under the influence of alcohol; or

when the person is under the influence of any other drug or under the combined influence of alcohol and any other drug; or

when the person’s alcohol concentration is 0.04 or more if the person is operating a commercial motor vehicle as defined in subdivision 4103(4) of this title.

A person who has previously been convicted of a violation of this section shall not operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical control of any vehicle on a highway and refuse a law enforcement officer’s reasonable request under the circumstances for an evidentiary test where the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person was in violation of subsection (a) of this section.

A person shall not operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical control of any vehicle on a highway and be involved in a crash or collision resulting in serious bodily injury or death to another and refuse a law enforcement officer’s reasonable request under the circumstances for an evidentiary test where the officer has reasonable grounds to believe the person has any amount of alcohol in the system.

A person who is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of subsection (a), (b), or (c) of this section when the person’s alcohol concentration is proven to be 0.16 or more shall not, for three years from the date of the conviction for which the person’s alcohol concentration is 0.16 or more, operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical control of any vehicle on a highway when the person’s alcohol concentration is 0.02 or more. The prohibition imposed by this subsection shall be in addition to any other penalties imposed by law.
(d) (1) A person who is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of subsection (a), (b), or (c) of this section when the person’s alcohol concentration is proven to be 0.16 or more shall not, for three years from the date of the conviction for which the person’s alcohol concentration is 0.16 or more, operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical control of any vehicle on a highway when the person’s alcohol concentration is 0.02 or more. The prohibition imposed by this subsection shall be in addition to any other penalties imposed by law.

A person shall not operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical control of any vehicle on a highway when the person’s alcohol concentration is 0.02 or more if the person has previously been convicted of a second or subsequent violation of subsection (a), (b), or (c) of this section within the preceding three years and the person’s alcohol concentration for the second or subsequent violation was proven to be 0.16 or greater. A violation of this subsection shall be considered a third or subsequent violation of this section and shall be subject to the penalties of subsection 1210(d) of this title.

The fact that a person charged with a violation of this section is or has been entitled to use a drug under the laws of this State shall not constitute a defense against any charge of violating this section.

A person may not be convicted of more than one violation of subsection (a) of this section arising out of the same incident.

For purposes of this section and section 1205 of this title, the defendant may assert as an affirmative defense that the person was not operating, attempting to operate, or in actual physical control of the vehicle because the person:

had no intention of placing the vehicle in motion; and

had not placed the vehicle in motion while under the influence.

As used in subdivision (a)(3) of this section, “under the influence of a drug” means that a person’s ability to operate a motor vehicle safely is diminished or impaired in the slightest degree. This subsection shall not be construed to affect the meaning of the term “under the influence of alcohol.”

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 267

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1973, No. 16

, § 1, eff. March 1, 1973;

1973, No. 79

, § 1, eff. May 23, 1973;

1975, No. 10

, § 2, eff. April 9, 1975;

1981, No. 103

, §§ 2, 2a;

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1989, No. 68

, § 2, eff. Dec. 1, 1989;

1991, No. 55

, § 2;

1997, No. 56

, § 1, eff. Aug. 1, 1997;

1999, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1999, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2001, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2005, No. 37

, § 1;

2007, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2011, No. 56

, § 3;

2013, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 3, 2014;

2017, No. 83

, § 161(4);

2019, No. 59

, § 27;

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. Jan. 1, 2022.

§ 1201. Section 1201 effective January 1, 2022; see also section 1201 effective until January 1, 2022 set out above. Operating vehicle under the influence of alcohol or other substance; criminal refusal; enhanced penalty for BAC of 0.16 or more.

A person shall not operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical control of any vehicle on a highway:

when the person’s alcohol concentration is:

0.08 or more; or

0.02 or more if the person is operating a school bus as defined in subdivision 4(34) of this title; or

0.04 or more if the person is operating a commercial vehicle as defined in subdivision 4103(4) of this title; or

when the person is under the influence of alcohol; or

when the person is under the influence of any other drug or under the combined influence of alcohol and any other drug.

A person who has previously been convicted of a violation of this section shall not operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical control of any vehicle on a highway and refuse a law enforcement officer’s reasonable request under the circumstances for an evidentiary test where the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person was in violation of subsection (a) of this section.

A person shall not operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical control of any vehicle on a highway and be involved in a crash or collision resulting in serious bodily injury or death to another and refuse a law enforcement officer’s reasonable request under the circumstances for an evidentiary test where the officer has reasonable grounds to believe the person has any amount of alcohol or drugs in his or her system.

A person who is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of subsection (a), (b), or (c) of this section when the person’s alcohol concentration is proven to be 0.16 or more shall not, for three years from the date of the conviction for which the person’s alcohol concentration is 0.16 or more, operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical control of any vehicle on a highway when the person’s alcohol concentration is 0.02 or more. The prohibition imposed by this subsection shall be in addition to any other penalties imposed by law.
(d) (1) A person who is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of subsection (a), (b), or (c) of this section when the person’s alcohol concentration is proven to be 0.16 or more shall not, for three years from the date of the conviction for which the person’s alcohol concentration is 0.16 or more, operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical control of any vehicle on a highway when the person’s alcohol concentration is 0.02 or more. The prohibition imposed by this subsection shall be in addition to any other penalties imposed by law.

A person shall not operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical control of any vehicle on a highway when the person’s alcohol concentration is 0.02 or more if the person has previously been convicted of a second or subsequent violation of subsection (a), (b), or (c) of this section within the preceding three years and the person’s alcohol concentration for the second or subsequent violation was proven to be 0.16 or greater. A violation of this subsection shall be considered a third or subsequent violation of this section and shall be subject to the penalties of subsection 1210(d) of this title.

The fact that a person charged with a violation of this section is or has been entitled to use a drug under the laws of this State shall not constitute a defense against any charge of violating this section.

A person may not be convicted of more than one violation of subsection (a) of this section arising out of the same incident.

For purposes of this section and section 1205 of this title, the defendant may assert as an affirmative defense that the person was not operating, attempting to operate, or in actual physical control of the vehicle because the person:

had no intention of placing the vehicle in motion; and

had not placed the vehicle in motion while under the influence.

As used in subdivision (a)(3) of this section, “under the influence of a drug” means that a person’s ability to operate a motor vehicle safely is diminished or impaired in the slightest degree. This subsection shall not be construed to affect the meaning of the term “under the influence of alcohol.”

Evidence of the results of a standardized field sobriety test conducted by a law enforcement officer trained in Advanced Roadside Impaired Driving Enforcement or a certified Drug Recognition Expert’s systematic evaluation of observable signs and symptoms of a person charged with a violation of this section shall be presumptively admissible at trial to demonstrate whether or not the person was operating under the influence in violation of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 267

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1973, No. 16

, § 1, eff. March 1, 1973;

1973, No. 79

, § 1, eff. May 23, 1973;

1975, No. 10

, § 2, eff. April 9, 1975;

1981, No. 103

, §§ 2, 2a;

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1989, No. 68

, § 2, eff. Dec. 1, 1989;

1991, No. 55

, § 2;

1997, No. 56

, § 1, eff. Aug. 1, 1997;

1999, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1999, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2001, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2005, No. 37

, § 1;

2007, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2011, No. 56

, § 3;

2013, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 3, 2014;

2017, No. 83

, § 161(4);

2019, No. 59

, § 27;

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. Jan. 1, 2022.

§ 1201c.
Calculation of suspensions and revocations.

Notwithstanding any direction or order from any person or entity to the contrary, the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall calculate, in accordance with applicable statutes and rules, the duration of suspensions, whether and when revocations, suspensions, and reinstatements shall occur, and all other required actions and calculations.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 1202.
Consent to taking of tests to determine blood alcohol content or presence of other drug.

Implied consent.
(a) (1) Implied consent.

Blood test. If breath testing equipment is not reasonably available or if the officer has reason to believe that the person is unable to give a sufficient sample of breath for testing or if the law enforcement officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the person is under the influence of a drug other than alcohol, the person is deemed to have given consent to the taking of an evidentiary sample of blood. If in the officer’s opinion the person is incapable of decision or unconscious or dead, it is deemed that the person’s consent is given and a sample of blood shall be taken. A blood test sought pursuant to this subdivision (2) shall be obtained pursuant to subsection (f) of this section.

Evidentiary test. The evidentiary test shall be required of a person when a law enforcement officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the person was operating, attempting to operate, or in actual physical control of a vehicle in violation of section 1201 of this title.

Fatal collision or incident resulting in serious bodily injury. The evidentiary test shall also be required if the person is the surviving operator of a motor vehicle involved in a fatal incident or collision or an incident or collision resulting in serious bodily injury and the law enforcement officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the person has any amount of alcohol or other drug in his or her system.

(a) (1)

Implied consent.

Subsection (a) effective January 1, 2022; see also subsection (a) effective until January 1, 2022 set out above.

Every person who operates, attempts to operate, or is in actual physical control of any vehicle on a highway in this State is deemed to have given consent to an evidentiary test of that person’s breath for the purpose of determining the person’s alcohol concentration or the presence of other drug in the blood. The test shall be administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer.

(2)

Blood test.

If breath testing equipment is not reasonably available or if the officer has reason to believe that the person is unable to give a sufficient sample of breath for testing or if the law enforcement officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the person is under the influence of a drug other than alcohol, the person is deemed to have given consent to the taking of an evidentiary sample of blood. If in the officer’s opinion the person is incapable of decision or unconscious or dead, it is deemed that the person’s consent is given and a sample of blood shall be taken. A blood test sought pursuant to this subdivision (2) shall be obtained pursuant to subsection (f) of this section.

(3)

Saliva test.

If the law enforcement officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the person is under the influence of a drug other than alcohol, or under the combined influence of alcohol and a drug, the person is deemed to have given consent to providing of an evidentiary sample of saliva. A saliva test sought pursuant to this subdivision (3) shall be obtained pursuant to subsection (f) of this section. Any saliva test administered under this section shall be used only for the limited purpose of detecting the presence of a drug in the person’s body and shall not be used to extract DNA information.

(4)

Evidentiary test.

The evidentiary test shall be required of a person when a law enforcement officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the person was operating, attempting to operate, or in actual physical control of a vehicle in violation of section 1201 of this title.

Fatal collision or incident resulting in serious bodily injury. The evidentiary test shall also be required if the person is the surviving operator of a motor vehicle involved in a fatal incident or collision or an incident or collision resulting in serious bodily injury and the law enforcement officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the person has any amount of alcohol or other drug in his or her system.

Subsection (a) effective until January 1, 2022; see also subsection (a) effective January 1, 2022 set out below.

Every person who operates, attempts to operate, or is in actual physical control of any vehicle on a highway in this State is deemed to have given consent to an evidentiary test of that person’s breath for the purpose of determining the person’s alcohol concentration or the presence of other drug in the blood. The test shall be administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer.

A refusal to take a breath test may be introduced as evidence in a criminal proceeding.

A person who is requested by a law enforcement officer to submit to an evidentiary test or tests has a right as limited in this subsection to consult an attorney before deciding whether or not to submit to such a test or tests. The person must decide whether or not to submit to the evidentiary test or tests within a reasonable time and not later than 30 minutes after the time of the initial attempt to contact the attorney. The person must make a decision about whether to submit to the test or tests at the expiration of the 30 minutes, regardless of whether a consultation took place.

At the time a test is requested, the person shall be informed of the following statutory information:

Vermont law authorizes a law enforcement officer to request a test to determine whether the person is under the influence of alcohol or other drug.

If the officer’s request is reasonable and testing is refused, the person’s license or privilege to operate will be suspended for at least six months.

If a test is taken and the results indicate that the person is under the influence of alcohol or other drug, the person will be subject to criminal charges and the person’s license or privilege to operate will be suspended for at least 90 days.

Subdivision (d)(4) effective until January 1, 2022; see also subdivision (d)(4) effective January 1, 2022 set out below.

A person who is requested by a law enforcement officer to submit to an evidentiary test or tests has the limited right to consult an attorney before deciding whether or not to submit to such a test or tests. The person must decide whether or not to submit to the evidentiary test or tests within a reasonable time and no later than 30 minutes from the time of the initial attempt to contact the attorney, regardless of whether a consultation took place. The person also has the right to have additional tests made by someone of the person’s own choosing at the person’s own expense. The person shall also be informed of the location of one or more facilities available for drawing blood.

(4)

Subdivision (d)(4) effective January 1, 2022; see also subdivision (d)(4) effective until January 1, 2022 set out above.

A person who is requested by a law enforcement officer to submit to an evidentiary test or tests has the limited right to consult an attorney before deciding whether or not to submit to such a test or tests. The person must decide whether or not to submit to the evidentiary test or tests within a reasonable time and not later than 30 minutes from the time of the initial attempt to contact the attorney, regardless of whether a consultation took place. The person also has the right to have additional tests made by someone of the person’s own choosing at the person’s own expense. The person shall also be informed of the location of one or more facilities available for drawing blood.

A person who is requested by a law enforcement officer to submit to an evidentiary test administered with an infrared breath-testing instrument may elect to have a second infrared test administered immediately after receiving the results of the first test.

If the person refuses to take an evidentiary test, the refusal may be offered into evidence against the person at trial, whether or not a search warrant is sought. The person may be charged with the crime of criminal refusal if the person:

has previously been convicted of a violation of section 1201 of this title; or

is involved in a crash or collision resulting in serious bodily injury or death to another, in which case the court may issue a search warrant and order the person to submit to a blood test, the results of which may be offered into evidence against the person at trial.

In any proceeding under this subchapter, a law enforcement officer’s testimony that he or she is certified pursuant to section

20 V.S.A. § 2358

shall be prima facie evidence of that fact.

Subsection (f) effective until January 1, 2022; see also subsection (f) effective January 1, 2022 set out below.

If a blood test is sought from a person pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) of this section, or if a person who has been involved in a crash or collision resulting in serious bodily injury or death to another refuses an evidentiary test, a law enforcement officer may apply for a search warrant pursuant to Rule 41 of the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure to obtain a sample of blood for an evidentiary test. If a blood sample is obtained by search warrant, the fact of the refusal may still be introduced in evidence, in addition to the results of the evidentiary test. Once a law enforcement official begins the application process for a search warrant, the law enforcement official is not obligated to discontinue the process even if the person later agrees to provide an evidentiary breath sample. The limitation created by Rule 41(g) of the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure regarding blood specimens shall not apply to search warrants authorized by this section.

(f) (1)

Subsection (f) effective January 1, 2022; see also subsection (f) effective until January 1, 2022 set out above.

If a blood test is sought from a person pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) of this section, or if a person who has been involved in a crash or collision resulting in serious bodily injury or death to another refuses an evidentiary test, a law enforcement officer may apply for a search warrant pursuant to Rule 41 of the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure to obtain a sample of blood for an evidentiary test. Pursuant to subdivision (d)(6) of this section, if a blood sample is obtained by search warrant, the fact of the refusal may still be introduced in evidence, in addition to the results of the evidentiary test. Once a law enforcement official begins the application process for a search warrant, the law enforcement official is not obligated to discontinue the process even if the person later agrees to provide an evidentiary sample. The limitation created by Rule 41(g) of the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure regarding blood specimens shall not apply to search warrants authorized by this section.

(2)

If an evidentiary saliva test is sought from a person pursuant to subdivision (a)(3) of this section, a law enforcement officer may apply for a search warrant pursuant to Rule 41 of the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure to obtain a sample of saliva for the evidentiary test. Pursuant to subdivision (d)(6) of this section, if a saliva sample is obtained by search warrant, the fact of the refusal may still be introduced in evidence, in addition to the results of the evidentiary test.

Subsection (g) effective until January 1, 2022; see also subsection (g) effective January 1, 2022 set out below.

The Defender General shall provide statewide 24-hour coverage seven days a week to assure that adequate legal services are available to persons entitled to consult an attorney under this section.

(g)

Subsection (g) effective January 1, 2022; see also subsection (g) effective until January 1, 2022 set out above.

The Defender General shall provide statewide 24-hour coverage seven days a week to ensure that adequate legal services are available to persons entitled to consult an attorney under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 267

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1973, No. 79

, § 2, eff. May 23, 1973;

1977, No. 96

, eff. May 5, 1977;

1981, No. 103

, § 3;

1985, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1989, No. 68

, § 3, eff. Dec. 1, 1989;

1991, No. 55

, § 3;

1991, No. 57

, § 2, eff. July 4, 1991;

1997, No. 56

, §§ 2, 3, eff. Aug. 1, 1997;

1997, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

1999, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

2001, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2017, No. 62

, § 9;

2017, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 23.